Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2592.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 18, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 18-105, to read: START_STATUTE18-105. Regulation of artificial intelligence systems; budget units; legislative ratification of rules; annual report; definitions A. The director shall require each budget unit to do all of the following: 1. Identify opportunities to implement artificial intelligence system solutions that reduce administrative burdens. 2. Eliminate regulations that unnecessarily restrict artificial intelligence system innovation. 3. Streamline procurement processes to enable the adoption of artificial intelligence systems. 4. Establish enterprise artificial intelligence system governance to ensure consistent, efficient and appropriate use of artificial intelligence to better achieve internal and external objectives. 5. review existing regulations affecting artificial intelligence system development to identify instances of regulatory capture or negative impacts on competition and innovation. 6. Modify or eliminate any artificial intelligence system regulation that creates unreasonable barriers to artificial intelligence system innovation. B. In implementing an artificial intelligence system, each budget unit shall: 1. Focus on reducing costs and improving service delivery. 2. Not create new regulatory requirements that are solely applicable to private sector artificial intelligence system development. 3. Use existing staff and resources without creating new administrative bodies. C. A budget unit may not adopt rules specifically regulating artificial intelligence systems or computational resources unless all of the following apply: 1. The legislature provides an express statutory delegation to address a specific harm. 2. The rule is the least restrictive means available to achieve the statutory objective. 3. The benefit of the rule clearly OUTWEIGHS impacts on innovation and competition. 4. The rule does not create a barrier to market entry or an advantage to an incumbent firm. D. Any emergency or temporary rule THAT specifically regulates artificial intelligence systems or computational resources must be approved by the legislature, subject to all of the following: 1. Each rule that is in effect at the beginning of a legislative session must receive a ratifying vote in order for the rule to remain in effect at the conclusion of the legislative session. 2. The legislature shall schedule a vote on the floor of each house to ratify all such rules within the first thirty days of the legislative session. 3. The legislature may not require more than a simple majority vote to ratify a rule. E. ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR, THE DIRECTOR SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE GOVERNOR, and shall submit a copy to the secretary of state, REGARDING THE IMPLEMENTATION AND EFFECTIVENESS OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS BY BUDGET UNITS DURING THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR. THE REPORT must do all of the following: 1. IDENTIFY EACH BUDGET UNIT THAT IMPLEMENTED AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM DURING THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR. 2. DESCRIBE THE FUNCTION OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS TO WHICH THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WAS APPLIED. 3. Include, tO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE MEASURES OF GOVERNMENT EFFICIENCY resulting from the artificial intelligence system for all of the following: (a) REDUCTIONS IN PROCESSING TIME OR BACKLOGS. (b) COST SAVINGS OR COST AVOIDANCE. (c) IMPROVEMENTS IN SERVICE DELIVERY OR OUTPUT QUALITY. 4. IDENTIFY ANY REGULATORY, PROCUREMENT OR OPERATIONAL BARRIERS that were ENCOUNTERED and THAT LIMITED THE EFFECTIVE USE OF the ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Artificial intelligence system" means any machine learning-based system that can, for a given set of objectives, generate outputs such as content, predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing physical or virtual environments. 2. "Computational resource" means any tool, technology, system or infrastructure, whether digital, analog or quantum, that facilitates computation, data processing, storage, transmission, manipulation or use of information. 3. "Content" means any digitally generated, manipulated or synthesized text, image, audio recording, video recording, three-dimensional model or interactive element, or any combination of these, that can be produced as output by an artificial intelligence system. END_STATUTE